Illinois, session 104th, HB655.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Government Electronic Notification 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 55/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Local 8Government Electronic Notification Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-856, eff. 1-1-19.)